Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Advanced Practice Registered Nurses

§ 1611.
Advanced practice registered nurse licensure.

To be eligible for an APRN license, an applicant shall:

Have a degree or certificate from a Vermont graduate nursing program approved by the Board or a U.S. graduate program approved by a state or a national accrediting agency that includes a curriculum substantially equivalent to Vermont programs approved by the Board. The educational program shall meet the educational standards set by the national accrediting board and the national certifying board. Programs shall include a supervised clinical component in the role and population focus of the applicant’s certification. The program shall prepare nurses to practice advanced nursing in a role as a nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, certified nurse anesthetist, or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric or mental health nursing and shall include, at a minimum, graduate level courses in:

advanced pharmacotherapeutics;

advanced patient assessment; and

advanced pathophysiology.

Hold current advanced nursing certification in a role and population focus granted by a national certifying organization recognized by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 66

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2011; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 9, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1611a.
Fee waiver; pro bono practice.

An advanced practice registered nurse who holds an unrestricted license in all jurisdictions in which the nurse is currently licensed, who certifies to the Board that he or she will limit his or her practice in Vermont to providing pro bono services at a free or reduced fee clinic, and who meets the requirements for licensure shall be licensed by the Board without payment of the licensing application fee.

A license granted under this section shall authorize the licensee to practice advanced practice registered nursing on a voluntary basis in Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 9, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1612.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1613.
Transition to practice.

An APRN with fewer than 24 months and 2,400 hours of licensed active advanced nursing practice in an initial role and population focus or fewer than 12 months and 1,600 hours for any additional role and population focus shall have a formal agreement with a collaborating provider as required by Board rule.
(a) (1) An APRN with fewer than 24 months and 2,400 hours of licensed active advanced nursing practice in an initial role and population focus or fewer than 12 months and 1,600 hours for any additional role and population focus shall have a formal agreement with a collaborating provider as required by Board rule.

An APRN shall have and maintain signed and dated copies of all required collaborative provider agreements.

An APRN required to practice with a collaborative provider agreement may not engage in solo practice, except with regard to a role and population focus in which the APRN has met the requirements of this subsection.

An APRN who satisfies the requirements to engage in solo practice pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall notify the Board that these requirements have been met.

The Board may waive or modify the collaborative provider agreement requirement as necessary to allow an APRN to practice independently during a declared state of emergency.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 66

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2011; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 11;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. March 30, 2020.

§ 1614.
APRN renewal.

An APRN license renewal application shall include:

documentation of completion of the APRN practice requirement;

possession of a current certification by a national APRN specialty certifying organization; and

a current collaborative provider agreement if required for transition to practice.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 66

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2011; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1615.
Advanced practice registered nurses; regulatory authority; unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the provisions of

3 V.S.A. § 129a

and section 1582 of this chapter, the Board may deny an application for licensure, renewal, or reinstatement or may revoke, suspend, or otherwise discipline an advanced practice registered nurse upon due notice and opportunity for hearing if the person engages in the following conduct:

Abandonment of a patient in violation of the duty to maintain a provider-patient relationship within the reasonable expectations of continuing care or referral.

Solicitation of professional patronage by agents or persons or profiting from the acts of those representing themselves to be agents of the licensed APRN.

Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide the fees received for professional services for any person for bringing or referring a patient.

Practice beyond those acts and situations that are within the limits of the knowledge and experience of the APRN, and, for an APRN who is practicing under a collaborative agreement, practice beyond those acts and situations that are within both the usual scope of the collaborating provider’s practice and the terms of the collaborative agreement.

For an APRN who acts as the collaborating provider for an APRN who is practicing under a collaboration agreement, allowing the mentored APRN to perform a medical act that is outside the usual scope of the mentor’s own practice or that the mentored APRN is not qualified to perform by training or experience or that is not consistent with the requirements of this chapter and the rules of the Board.

Providing, prescribing, dispensing, or furnishing medical services or prescription medication or prescription-only devices to a person in response to any communication transmitted or received by computer or other electronic means when the licensee fails to take the following actions to establish and maintain a proper provider-patient relationship:

a reasonable effort to verify that the person requesting medication is in fact the patient and is in fact who the person claims to be;

establishment of documented diagnosis through the use of accepted medical practices; and

maintenance of a current medical record.

Prescribing, selling, administering, distributing, ordering, or dispensing any drug legally classified as a controlled substance for his or her own use or for an immediate family member.

Signing a blank or undated prescription form.

Administering or promoting the sale of medication, devices, appliances, or other patient goods and services in a manner that exploits the patient.

Selling, prescribing, giving away, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes.

Agreeing with clinical or bioanalytical laboratories to make payments to such laboratories for individual tests or test series for patients, unless the APRN discloses on the bills to patients or third party payers the name of such laboratory, the amount or amounts to such laboratory for individual tests or test series, and the amount of his or her processing charge or procurement, if any, for each specimen taken.

Willful misrepresentation in treatments.

Permitting one’s name or license to be used by a person, group, or corporation when not actually in charge of or responsible for the treatment given.

For the purposes of subdivision (a)(6) of this section, an electronic, online, or telephonic evaluation by questionnaire is inadequate for the initial evaluation of the patient.
(b) (1) For the purposes of subdivision (a)(6) of this section, an electronic, online, or telephonic evaluation by questionnaire is inadequate for the initial evaluation of the patient.

The following would not be in violation of subdivision (a)(6) of this section:

initial admission orders for newly hospitalized patients;

prescribing for a patient of another provider for whom the prescriber has taken call;

prescribing for a patient examined by a licensed APRN, physician assistant, or other practitioner authorized by law and supported by the APRN;

continuing medication on a short-term basis for a new patient prior to the patient’s first appointment; or

emergency situations where the life or health of the patient is in imminent danger.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 66

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2011; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 9, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1615a.
APRN subcommittee.

The Board shall appoint a subcommittee to study and report to the Board on matters relating to advanced practice registered nurse practice.

The subcommittee shall be composed of at least five members.

The majority shall be advanced practice registered nurses who are licensed and in good standing in this State.

At least one member shall be a member of the public, and at least one member shall be a physician designated by the Board of Medical Practice.

Members of the subcommittee shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 9, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1616.
Nurse practitioner and nurse midwife signature authority.

Whenever any provision of Vermont statute or rule or any form provided to any person in this State requires a signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or other endorsement by a physician, such statute, rule, or form shall be deemed to include a signature, certification, stamp, verification, affidavit, or other endorsement by an advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) licensed pursuant to this chapter and certified as a nurse practitioner or a nurse midwife; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of APRNs.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.